Utah statutes.
41-22-10.7.   Vehicle equipment requirements -- Rulemaking -- Exceptions.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (3), an off-highway vehicle shall be
equipped with:
(a)  brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold the
vehicle under normal operating conditions;
(b)  headlights and taillights when operated between sunset and sunrise;
(c)  a noise control device and except for a snowmobile, a spark arrestor
device; and
(d)  when operated on sand dunes designated by the board, a safety flag that
is:
(i)  red or orange in color;
(ii)  a minimum of six by 12 inches; and
(iii)  attached to:
(A)  the off-highway vehicle so that the safety flag is at least eight feet
above the surface of level ground; or
(B)  the protective headgear of a person operating a motorcycle so that the
safety flag is at least 18 inches above the top of the person's head.
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the board may make rules which set standards for the equipment and which
designate sand dunes where safety flags are required under Subsection (1).
(3)  An off-highway implement of husbandry used only in agricultural
operations and not operated on a highway, is exempt from the provisions of
this section.
